Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1419
Bondholder; trustee; enforcement of rights.

Any holder of bonds issued under sections 70-1401 to 70-1423 or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreement, except to the extent the rights pursuant to this section may be restricted by such trust agreement or the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted in sections 70-1401 to 70-1423, or, to the extent permitted by law, under such trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or under any agreement or other contract executed by the joint authority pursuant to sections 70-1401 to 70-1423, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by sections 70-1401 to 70-1423 or by such trust agreement or resolution to be performed by any joint authority or member district or by any officer of such joint authority, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of rents, rates, fees, and charges.

Laws 1982, LB 852, § 19.